Utah statutes.
41-1a-413.   Personalized plates -- Sale of vehicle -- Transfer of plates --
Release of priority.
If a person who has been issued personalized license plates sells, trades, or
otherwise releases ownership of the vehicle for which the personalized license
plates have been issued, that person shall immediately:
(1)  apply to display the license plates on a different vehicle owned by the
person; or
(2)  surrender the license plates to the division and release his priority to
the letters and numbers displayed on the personalized license plates.
